Utah statutes.
67-19-14.3.   Continuation of Insurance Benefits Program -- Creation -- Coverage following death in the line of duty.

(1)  There is created the "Continuation of Insurance Benefits Program" to provide a continuation of insurance to the surviving spouse and family of any state employee whose death occurs in the line of duty.

(2)  The insurance coverage shall be the same coverage as provided under Section 49-20-406.

(3)  The program provides that unused accumulated sick leave of a deceased employee may be used for additional medical coverage in the same manner as provided under Section 67-19-14.2 or 67-19-14.4 as applicable.



Amended by Chapter 15, 2005 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 114, 2005 General Session

